Vermont statutes. Title 27A Vermont Common Interest Ownership Act (1994)
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Common Interest Communities
§ 2-120.
Master associations.

If the declaration provides that any of the powers described in section 3-102 of this title may be exercised by or may be delegated to a corporation or association on behalf of one or more common interest communities or for the benefit of the unit owners of one or more common interest communities, the provisions of this title applicable to unit owners’ associations apply to that corporation or unincorporated association, except as modified by this section.

Unless a master association is acting in the capacity of an association described in section 3-101 of this title, it may exercise the powers provided in subdivision 3-102(a)(2) of this title only to the extent permitted in the declaration or described in the delegations of power of those common interest communities to the master association.

If the declaration provides that the executive board may delegate certain powers to a master association, the members of the executive board shall not be liable for acts or omissions of the master association with respect to those powers after the delegation.

The rights and responsibilities of unit owners with respect to the unit owners’ association as provided in sections 3-103, 3-106, and 3-109 of this title apply only to the conduct of the affairs of a master association in regard to those persons who elect the board of a master association, whether or not those persons are unit owners.

Even if a master association is also an association under section 3-101 of this title, the instrument creating the master association and the declaration may provide that the executive board of the master association shall be elected after the period of declarant control in any one of the following ways:

All unit owners of all common interest communities subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All members of the executive boards of all common interest communities subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board.

All unit owners of each common interest community subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

All members of the executive board of each common interest community subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section adopts the approach uniformly adopted by UCA, UPCA, and MRECA.

It is common in large or multi-phased condominiums or planned communities, particularly those developed under existing laws, for the declarant to create a master or umbrella association which provides management services or decision-making functions for a series of smaller projects. While it is expected that this phenomenon will be less necessary under this Act because of the permissible period of time for declarant control over the project, it is nonetheless possible in larger developments that this form of management will continue.

Subsection (a) states the general rule that the powers of a unit owners’ association may only be exercised by, or delegated to, a master association if the declaration for the common interest community permits that result. The declaration may have originally provided for a master association; alternatively, the unit owners of several common interest communities may amend their declarations in similar fashion to provide for this power. Subsection (a) makes it clear that, if any of the powers of the unit owners’ association may be exercised by, or delegated to, a master association, all other provisions of this Act, which apply to a unit owners’ association apply to that master association except as modified by this section. Accordingly, provisions on notice, voting, quorums, records, meetings, and other matters which apply to the unit owners’ association would apply with equal validity to such a master association.

Subsection (b) limits the ability of a master association to exercise the powers of the unit owners’ association, except in those cases where the master association is actually acting as the only association for one or more common interest communities. In those cases where it is not so acting, however, the only powers of the unit owners’ association which the master association may exercise are the ones expressly permitted in the declaration or in the delegation of power. This is in significant contrast with the rule of Section 3-102 that all of the powers described in that section may be exercised unless limited by the declaration.

Subsection (c) clarifies the liability of the members of the executive board of a unit owners’ association when the common interest community for which the unit owners’ association acts has delegated some of its powers to a master association. In that instance, subsection (c) makes it clear that the members of the executive board of the unit owners’ association have no liability for acts and omissions of the master association board; under subsection (a), that liability lies with the members of the master association.

Subsection (d) addresses the question of the rights and responsibilities of the unit owners in their dealings with the master board. A variety of sections enumerated in subsection (d) provide certain rights and powers to unit owners in their dealings with their association. In the affairs of the master association, however, it would be incongruous for the unit owners to maintain those same rights if those unit owners were not in fact electing the master board. Thus, for example, the question of election of directors, meetings, notice of meetings, quorums, and other matters enumerated in those sections would have little meaning if those sections were read literally when applied to a master board which was not elected by all members of the common interest community subject to the master board. For that reason, the rights of notice, voting, and other rights enumerated in the Act are available only to the persons who actually elect the board.

Subsection (e) recognizes that there may be reasons for a representative form of election of directors of the master association. Alternatively, there may be cases where at-large election is reasonable. For that reason, subsection (e) provides that, after the period of declarant control has terminated, there may be four ways of electing the master association board. Those four ways are: (1) at-large election of the master board among all the common interest communities subject to the master association, (2) at-large election of the master board only among the members of the executive boards of all common interest communities subject to the master association, (3) each common interest community might have designated positions on the master board, and those spaces could be filled by an at-large election among all the members of each common interest community, or (4) the designated positions could be filled by an election only among the members of the executive board of the unit owners’ association for each common interest community. It would only be in the case of an at-large election of the master board among all common interest communities that subsection (d) would have no relevance.

§ 2-121.
Merger or consolidation of common interest communities.

Any two or more common interest communities with the same form of ownership, by agreement of the unit owners as provided in subsection (b) of this section, may be merged or consolidated into a single common interest community by agreement of the unit owners. In the event of a merger or consolidation, unless the agreement otherwise provides, the resultant common interest community is the successor, for all purposes, of all the preexisting common interest communities, and the operations and activities of all associations of the preexisting common interest communities are merged or consolidated into a single association that holds the powers, rights, obligations, assets and liabilities of the preexisting associations.

An agreement of two or more common interest communities to merge or consolidate pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be evidenced by an agreement prepared, executed, recorded and certified by the president of the association of each of the preexisting common interest communities following approval by owners of units to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each common interest community required to terminate that common interest community. The agreement shall not be effective until it is recorded in all municipalities in which the common interest community is located.

Every merger or consolidation agreement shall provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new association among the units of the resultant common interest community either:

by stating the reallocations or the formulas upon which they are based; or

by stating the percentage of overall allocated interests of the new common interest community which are allocated to all of the units comprising each of the preexisting common interest communities, and providing that the portion of the percentages allocated to each unit formerly comprising a part of a preexisting common interest community must be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to that unit by the declaration of the preexisting common interest community.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

There may be circumstances where common interest communities may wish to merge or consolidate their activities by the creation of a single common interest community; this section provides for that possibility.

Under subsection (b), the merger or consolidation agreement is treated for recording purposes as an amendment to the declaration, and the same requirements for approval are mandated as for termination.

Subsection (c) does not state a minimum requirement for the contents of a merger or consolidation agreement, and any additional clauses not inconsistent with subsection (c) may be included. The important point that subsection (c) makes is that the reallocation of the allocated interests must be carefully stated.

Subsection (a) makes it clear that a merger or consolidation may occur by the same vote of the unit owners necessary to terminate the common interest community.
If two or more common interest communities are merged or consolidated, the resulting common interest community is for all purposes the legal successor of the pre-existing common interest community, with a single association for all purposes.
In the event common interest communities did not wish to completely merge or consolidate their affairs, it would also be possible for them to create a master association pursuant to Section 2-120.

Subsection (c) states two alternative rules in this respect. First, the reallocations may be accomplished by stating specifically the allocation of allocated interests to each unit, or by stating the formulas by which those interests may be allocated to each unit in all of the pre-existing common interest communities.
Alternatively, the merger or consolidation agreement may state the percentage of overall allocated interests allocated to “all of the units comprising each of the pre-existing common interest communities.”
The agreement might then also provide that the position of the percentage allocated to each unit from along the shares allocated to each common interests community will be equal to the percentage of allocated interests allocated to that unit by the declaration of the pre-existing common interest community.
An example of how this alternative formulation would operate may be useful.

Example:
Assume that two adjoining planned communities wish to merge their activities into one planned community. Assume that the first planned community consists of 10 one-bedroom units, with an annual budget of $10,000.
Assume further that each of the units, being identical, has an equal common expense liability of 10% and one vote per unit.

The second planned community consists of 40 units, with 20 two-bedroom units and 20 three-bedroom units.
The budget of the second planned community consists of $70,000 per year. Each of the two-bedroom units has been allocated a 2% common expense liability, while each of the three-bedroom units has been allocated a 3% common expense liability.
Finally, each of the units in the second planned community also has an equal vote.

There is no provision in the Act which mandates a particular allocation among planned communities one and two as to either common expense liabilities or votes.
Should the unit owners wish to retain as much similarity to their previous common expense liabilities, however, and should they wish to retain equal voting in a merged project, it would be possible for them, pursuant to subsection (c)(ii), to state “the percentage of overall common expense liabilities and votes in the new association” as follows: as to common expense liabilities, they might allocate 12.5% of the common expense liabilities in the merged project to planned community 1, and 87.5% thereof to planned community 2.
If the agreement further provided that “the portion of the percentages allocated to each unit formerly comprising a part on the pre-existing planned community must be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to that unit by the declaration of the pre-existing planned community” as required by subsection (c), each unit in planned community one would then have allocated to it 1.25% of the common expense liabilities in the new planned community.
It happens that 1.25% of the common expenses of a merged planned community which has a budget of $80,000 equals $1,000.

Under the same rationale, if each of the two-bedroom units in the second planned community, to which were formerly allocated 2% of the common expense liabilities, now has allocated 2% of the 87.5% allocated to the second planned community, each of those units would then have allocated to it 1.75% of the common expense liabilities of the new planned community. 1.75% of $80,000 is $1,400.
Similarly, each of the three-bedroom units would then have allocated to it 2.625% of the common expense liabilities in the merged planned community.
That percentage of the common expense liabilities of $80,000 would yield an annual cost of $2,100, the same cost as previously obtained in planned community 2.

Further, the unit owners are free to allocate votes among the units in any way which they see fit.
Of course, if they choose to allocate equal votes to all the units, which was the method previously used in both planned communities, this would have the effect of giving 20% of the votes to planned community 1, even though planned community one had only 12.5% of the common expense liabilities.
It may be, however, that this tracks with the expectations of the unit owners in both planned communities.
Alternatively, planned community one might be allocated 12.5% of the votes, which, when divided up among the 10 units, would give each one-bedroom unit a .125 vote.
If 87.5% of the votes were allocated equally among the unit owners in the second planned community, then each of the unit owners in planned community two would have .21875 votes.

If some other configuration was to be desired, then the allocations would of necessity be made pursuant to paragraph (c)(i) rather than (c)(ii).

The same result would be reached in a merger of planned communities or cooperatives.

§ 2-122.
Addition of unspecified real estate.

If the right to add unspecified real estate is reserved in the declaration of a planned community, the declarant, in addition to any other development right, may amend the declaration at any time during the time specified in the declaration to add additional real estate to the planned community without describing that real estate in the original declaration; provided, the amount of real estate added to the planned community does not exceed 10 percent of the real estate described in subdivision 2-105(a)(3) of this title and the number of units is not increased beyond the number stated in the original declaration.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

In assembling land for large “new town” planned communities, developers have from time to time been unable to secure small parcels of real estate within the outer boundaries of the development at the time the original covenants for the development were recorded.
Subsequently, however, for a variety of reasons, those parcels may become available and would logically form a part of the overall development.
As a matter of policy, there is no reason to prohibit the amendment of the declaration to permit the addition of that land to the development, so long as that addition does not substantially increase the potential common expenses of the unit owners, nor the density of the project as originally project by the declarant in his public offering statement.

This section was designed to address this relatively unusual problem.
It permits the declarant to add those after-acquired parcels of real estate to the development.
This power is available only if the declarant makes clear in his original declaration that this development right has been reserved. The section also requires the declarant to impose his own time limit on the period during which this development right may be exercised.
To foreclose the possibility of an increase in the density of the project beyond that which was originally contemplated, the section also prohibits the declarant from increasing the number of units in the planned community beyond the number originally stated in the declaration.
Finally, to impose a reasonable limitation on the amount of new land that may be added, the amount of real estate added to the planned community pursuant to this section may not exceed 10% of the real estate originally subjected to the declaration.

§ 2-123.
Master planned communities.

The declaration for a common interest community may state that it is a master planned community if the declarant has reserved the development right to create at least 500 units that may be used for residential purposes, and at the time of the reservation that declarant owns or controls more than 500 acres on which the units may be built.

If the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are satisfied, the declaration for the master planned community need not state a maximum number of units and need not contain any of the information required by subdivisions 2-105(a)(3) through (14) of this title until the declaration is amended under subsection (c) of this section.

When each unit in a master planned community is conveyed to a purchaser, the declaration must contain:

a sufficient legal description of the unit and all portions of the master planned community in which any other units have been conveyed to a purchaser; and

all the information required by subdivisions 2-105(a)(3) through (14) of this title with respect to that real estate.

The only real estate in a master planned community which is subject to this title is units that have been declared or which are being offered for sale and any other real estate described pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. Other real estate that is or may become part of the master planned community is only subject to other law and to any other restrictions and limitations that appear as encumbrances duly recorded and indexed in the town clerk’s office.

If the public offering statement conspicuously identifies the fact that the community is a master planned community, the disclosure requirements contained in Article 4 of this title apply only with respect to units that have been declared or are being offered for sale in connection with the public offering statement and to the real estate described pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

Limitations in this title on the addition of unspecified real estate (section 2-122 of this title) do not apply to a master planned community.

The period of declarant control of the association for a master planned community terminates in accordance with any conditions specified in the declaration or otherwise at the time the declarant, in a recorded instrument and after giving notice in a record to all the unit owners, voluntarily surrenders all rights to control the activities of the association.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.

§ 2-124.
Termination following catastrophe.

If substantially all the units in a common interest community have been destroyed or are uninhabitable and the available methods for giving notice under section 3-121 of this title of a meeting of unit owners to consider termination under section 2-118 of this title will not likely result in receipt of the notice, the executive board or any other interested person may commence an action in superior court seeking to terminate the common interest community. During the pendency of the action, the court may issue whatever orders it considers appropriate, including appointment of a receiver. After a hearing, the court may terminate the common interest community or reduce its size and may issue any other order the court considers to be in the best interest of the unit owners and persons holding an interest in the common interest community.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. Jan. 1, 2012.